California statutes. Elections Code
In the case of the consolidation of any election called by the governing body of a city, district or other political subdivision with an election held in another city, district or other political subdivision, the governing body of one city, district or political subdivision may authorize the governing body of the other city, district or political subdivision to canvass the returns of the election. If this authority is given:

(a) The elections shall be held in all respects as if there were only one election.

(b) Only one form of ballot shall be used.

(c) The returns of the election need not be canvassed by the governing body of the authorizing city, district, or other political subdivision.

If that authority is given, the canvass may be made by any body or official authorized by law to canvass the returns of the election of such other city, district or political subdivision.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

10413.

When the returns of any elections consolidated pursuant to this part are required to be canvassed by the same body, the elections shall be held in all respects as if there were only one election, and only one form of ballot shall be used.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

10416.

Except as otherwise provided in this part, when elections are consolidated, the governing body ordering consolidation may, in the territory affected thereby, provide for:

(a) The appointment of precinct boards.

(b) The formation of precincts for such elections.

(c) The expenses of the election.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

10417.

Where under any law of the state the precincts, polling places or names of members of precinct boards are required to be described or otherwise set forth in the ordinance, resolution, order, notice or other document calling, giving notice of or otherwise pertaining to any election, and the election is consolidated, in whole or in part, with another election, the ordinance, resolution, order, notice or other document need not describe or set forth the precincts, polling places and the names of precinct board members pertaining to the territory affected by the consolidation but may instead state that these precincts, polling places, and precinct board members shall be the same as those provided for the other election within the territory affected by the consolidation, and in that event, the ordinance, resolution, order, notice, or other document shall refer to some ordinance, order, resolution, or notice calling, providing for or giving notice of the other election and which sets forth these precincts, polling places, and the names of precinct board members. This reference may be made by giving the number and title or date of adoption of the ordinance, resolution, or order, or the date or proposed date of any publication of the notice and the name of the newspaper in which the notice has been or will be published, or by any other definite description. Notwithstanding the provision of any other provision of law, this reference need not be made in the case of an election consolidated with a statewide election.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

10418.

(a) Whenever an election is to be held on the same day as a statewide election, a special election, or an election held pursuant to Section 1302 or 1303, the election may be consolidated with the statewide or special election, or the election held
 pursuant to Section 1302 or 1303, as applicable. If consolidated, the consolidated election shall be held and conducted, election boards appointed, voting precincts designated, candidates nominated, ballots printed, polls opened and closed, voter challenges determined, ballots counted and returned, returns canvassed, results declared, certificates of election issued, recounts conducted, election contests presented, and all other proceedings incidental to and connected with the election shall be regulated and done in accordance with the provisions
 of law regulating the statewide or special election, or the election held pursuant to Section 1302 or 1303, as applicable.

(b) The precincts used at the consolidated election shall be those used for the statewide, special,
 or regularly scheduled election and, where necessary, the county elections official may adjust precinct lines to coincide with the boundaries of the particular jurisdiction.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 98, Sec. 2.   (AB 331)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------



PART 4. UNIFORM DISTRICT ELECTION LAW [10500. - 10556.]

10500.

(a) This part may be cited as the Uniform District Election Law.

(b) As used in this part, the following definitions apply:

(1) “Affected county” means a county in which any land of the district or agency is situated.

(2) “Director” means a member of the governing body.

(3) “District” or
 “agency” means any district or agency of the type designated by and formed pursuant to the provisions of any principal act that incorporates this part.

(4) “Elective office” means any office that may, under the principal act of the district or agency, be filled by way of an election.

(5) “Elective officer” means “elective officer” as defined by the principal act of each district or agency or if not defined, any officer of a district or agency holding an office that can be filled by election.

(6) “General district election” means an election held pursuant to the provisions of this part.

(7) “Governing body” means the board of directors of a district or agency or the board or body which governs the activities of the district or agency.

(8) “Landowner voting district” means a district whose principal act requires an elector to be an owner of land located within the district.

(9) “Principal act” means the law providing for the creation of a particular district or agency or type of district or agency.

(10) “Principal county” means the county in which all the land in the district or agency is situated, or if the district or agency is situated in more than one county, the county in which the greatest portion of the land in the district or agency is situated.

(11) “Resident voting district” means any district other than a landowner voting district.

(12) “Secretary” means the secretary of the governing body or a person designated
 by him or her to perform a duty of the secretary.

(13) “Supervising authority” means the board of supervisors of the county in which is situated all or most of the land of a district.

(14) “Voter” means a voter or elector as respectively defined in the principal act of each district or agency.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 221, Sec. 19.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

10501.

It is the purpose of this part to provide a procedure for the election of elective officers of districts. These elections shall be called and conducted and the results canvassed, returned, and declared pursuant to this part.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

10502.

(a) This part shall apply to all districts and agencies whose principal acts so provide. However, the provisions of this part requiring the county elections official to conduct elections shall apply to all resident voting districts and agencies, and, at the discretion of the county elections official, may apply to landowner voting districts, notwithstanding any other provision of law.

(b) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), the county elections official shall conduct an election on
 behalf of a landowner voting district if the governing body of the district, by resolution, requests that assistance and agrees to reimburse the county pursuant to Section 10520 and any county ordinances or resolutions consistent therewith. A district making that request shall supply information regarding qualified voters pursuant to Section 10525, and any other pertinent information requested by the county elections official. The election may be conducted by all-mailed ballots at the discretion of the county elections official. The election may not be held on the same date as a regularly scheduled election. The county elections official may rely upon the list of qualified voters and other information supplied by the district and shall not be required to determine the qualified voters. If the district does not supply the required information regarding qualified voters and other pertinent information requested by the county elections official within the time specified in Section 10525, the county elections
 official shall have no further obligation with respect to the election, and the district shall be responsible for conducting all remaining election activities.

(c) Where this part conflicts with the principal act, this part shall apply and control.

(d) This part shall not apply to the election of elective officers of the district upon formation of the district, except as to the term of office of the officers.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

10503.

Where this part provides that the principal act shall govern, and the principal act contains no provisions on the matter, the general election laws of this state shall govern. Where neither this part nor the principal act apply, the general election laws of this state shall govern.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

10504.

Whenever this part requires the secretary of a district to deliver a notice or other information to the county elections official on or before a designated date, the secretary may personally deliver the notice or other information on or before that date, or may deliver the notice or other information by certified mail if the notice or other information will be received by the county elections official in the ordinary course of the mails on or before that designated date.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

10505.

The terms of office of elective officers in all new districts shall be determined as follows:

(a) If the district is formed in an odd-numbered year, the officers elected at the formation election shall hold office until noon on the first Friday in December of the next following odd-numbered year, provided officers elected at an election held on the first Tuesday after the first Monday in November shall hold office as provided in subdivision (c).

(b) If the district is formed in an even-numbered year, the officers elected at the formation election shall hold office until noon on the first Friday in
 December of the second next following odd-numbered year.

(c) The directors elected at the first general district election held in a district and at a formation election held at the same time as the general district election shall meet as soon as practicable after taking office and classify themselves by lot into two classes, as nearly equal in number as possible, and the terms of office of the class having the greater number shall be four years and the terms of office of the class having the lesser number shall be two years. All other elective officers elected at the election shall hold office for a term of four years or until their successor is elected and qualifies.

(d) Pursuant to Section 10404, a special district electing members of the governing body in odd-numbered years may, by
 resolution, require that its elections of governing body members be held on the same day as the statewide general election.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 731, Sec. 6.   (AB 1535)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

10506.

Whenever a district shall increase the number of divisions, if there are any, the terms of office of the offices of director thus created shall be determined by the governing body, but in no event shall the term designated by the governing body be for more than four years. The terms of office thus created shall be determined in such a manner as to keep as nearly equal as practicable the number of directors to be elected at each subsequent general district election. Upon the expiration of the term so designated by the governing body, the directorship shall be filled
 at the next general district election and general district elections held thereafter. The term of office of each subsequent director thus elected is four years or until his or her successor qualifies and takes office.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

10507.

Except as otherwise provided in this part, the term of office of each elective officer, elected or appointed pursuant to this part, is four years or until his or her successor qualifies and takes office.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

10508.

The principal act shall govern whether directors of a district are elected by divisions or by the district at large. A governing body may require that the directors of the governing body be elected using district-based elections pursuant to Section 10650.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 754, Sec. 1.   (AB 2389)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

10509.

On the 125th day prior to the day fixed for the general district election, the secretary shall deliver a notice to the county elections official. The notice shall bear the secretary’s signature and the district seal and shall also contain both of the following:

(a) The elective offices of the district to be filled at the next general district election, specifying which offices, if any, are for the balance of an unexpired term.

(b) Whether the district or the candidate is to pay for the publication of a statement of qualifications pursuant to Section 13307.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 454, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

10510.

(a) Forms for declarations of candidacy for all district offices shall be obtained from the office of the county elections official. The county elections official may, for convenience or necessity, authorize the district secretary to issue declarations of candidacy. The forms shall first be available on the 113th day prior to the general district election and shall be filed not later than 5 p.m. on the 88th day prior to the general district election in the office of the county elections official during regular office hours or may be filed by
 certified mail so that the forms reach the office of the county election official no later than the deadline for filing in that office. The county elections official shall record the date of filing upon the first page of each declaration of candidacy filed pursuant to this section. No candidate shall withdraw his or her declaration of candidacy after 5 p.m. on the 88th day prior to the general district election.

(b) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, a person shall not file nomination papers for more than one district office or term of office for the same district at the same election.

(c) On request of the district secretary, the county elections official shall provide the secretary with a copy of each declaration of candidacy filed pursuant to this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2005, Ch. 86, Sec. 4.   Effective July 19, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

10511.

The declaration of candidacy shall be in substantially the following form: I, _________________, do hereby declare myself as a candidate for election to the office of ___________________. (__ Initial here if the office for which you are running is for the balance of an unexpired term.) I am a registered voter. If elected, I will qualify and accept the office of __________________ and
 serve to the best of my ability. I request my name be placed on the official ballot of the district for the election to be held on the ___ day of _______, 20__, and that my name appear on the ballot as follows:(Print name above)My current residence address isand my telephone number is .I desire the following occupational designation to appear on the
 ballot under my name:(Print desired designation, if any, above)This occupational
 designation is true and in conformance with Section 13107 of the Elections Code.I am aware that any person who files or submits for filing a declaration of candidacy knowing that it or any part of it has been made falsely is punishable by a fine or imprisonment, or both, as set forth in Section 18203 of the Elections Code.
 I declare under penalty of perjury under the laws of the State of California that the foregoing is true and correct.Executed on , 20__,at (Place)(Signature of Candidate)

(History: Amended by Stats. 2003, Ch. 296, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

10512.

(a) Each candidate shall set forth in full the oath or affirmation set forth in Section 3 of Article XX of the California Constitution, which shall be filed with the declaration of candidacy. The county elections official or district secretary, or a person designated by the county elections official or district secretary, shall administer the oath.

(b) The county elections official or district secretary, or a person designated by the county elections official or district secretary, may administer the oath or affirmation set forth in Section 3 of Article XX of the California Constitution to the candidate elected to
 office.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 562, Sec. 7.   (AB 1829)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

10513.

Upon filing each declaration of candidacy, the county elections official shall examine the declaration to determine if it conforms with the provisions of this part and shall certify whether it is sufficient. For this purpose, the elections official shall be entitled to obtain from any officer of an affected county all information necessary to make this determination.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

10514.

The qualifications of a candidate for elective office, and of an elective officer, of a district shall be determined by the principal act of that district.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

10515.

(a) If, by 5 p.m. on the 83rd day prior to the day fixed for the general district election: (1) only one person has filed a declaration of candidacy for any elective office to be filled at that election, (2) no one has filed a declaration of candidacy for such an office, (3) in the case of directors to be elected from the district at large, the number of persons who have filed a declaration of candidacy for director at large does not exceed the number of offices of director at large to be filled at that election, or (4) in the case of
 directors who must reside in a division but be elected at large, the number of candidates for director at large from a division does not exceed the number required to be elected director at large while residing in that division; and if a petition signed by 10 percent of the voters or 50 voters, whichever is the smaller number, in the district or division if elected by division, requesting that the general district election be held has not been presented to the officer conducting the election, he or she shall submit a certificate of these facts to the supervising authority and request that the supervising authority, at a regular or special meeting held prior to the Monday before the first Friday in December in which the election is held, appoint to the office or offices the person or persons, if any, who have filed declarations of candidacy. The supervising authority shall make these appointments.

(b) If no person has filed a declaration of
 candidacy for any office, the supervising authority shall appoint any person to the office who is qualified on the date when the election would have been held. The person appointed shall qualify and take office and serve exactly as if elected at a general district election for the office.

(c) Where a director must be appointed to represent a division, all or most of which is not within the county governed by the supervising authority, then the board of supervisors of the county within which all or most of that division is located shall be the body to which request for appointment is made and which shall make the appointment.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

10516.

(a) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, in any district or agency election, if a declaration of candidacy for an incumbent elective officer of a district is not filed by 5 p.m. on the 88th day before the general district election, or is filed but then is withdrawn before 5 p.m. on the 88th day before the election, any person other than the person who was the incumbent on the 88th day shall have until 5 p.m. on the 83rd day before the election to file a declaration of candidacy for the elective office.

(b) This section is not applicable where there is no incumbent to be elected. If this section is applicable, notwithstanding Section 10510,
 a candidate may withdraw their declaration of candidacy until 5 p.m. on the 83rd day before the general election.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 355, Sec. 13.   (AB 1784)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

10517.

Except as otherwise provided by this part, the county elections official of each affected county shall conduct the general district election for the portion of the district located within the county. Where a district is located in two or more counties, the county elections officials of these counties may contract among themselves to have one of their number conduct the election for the district.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

10518.

If, within any portion of a county, only one district has scheduled a general district election, the county elections official may authorize the appropriate officer of the district to perform any of the functions required of the county elections official under this part.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

10519.

At the request of a district governing body, the county elections official may perform any of the duties of the district secretary and the supervising authority may perform any of the duties of the district governing body.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

10520.

Each district involved in a general district election in an affected county shall reimburse the county for the actual costs incurred by the county elections official thereof in conducting the general district election for that district. The county elections official of the affected county shall determine the amount due from each district and shall bill each district accordingly.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

10521.

Qualifications of voters of a district, the number of votes each voter may cast, and the method of determining that number of votes shall be governed by the principal act of that district.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

10522.

At least 125 days prior to the day fixed for the general district election, the secretary of a resident voting district shall deliver to the county elections official of each affected county a map showing the boundaries of the district and the boundaries of the divisions of the district, if any, within that county and a statement indicating in which divisions a director is to be elected and whether any elective officer is to be elected at large at the next general district election.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

10523.

Notwithstanding any provision in the principal act, elections shall be at large in any resident voter district in which there are fewer than 100 voters.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

10524.

At least 125 days prior to the date fixed by the general district election, the secretary of a landowner voting district shall deliver to the county elections official of each affected county a map or description of the boundaries of the district or divisions for which elections are to be held.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

10525.

(a) At least 35 days prior to the date fixed for the landowner district election, the secretary of a landowner district for which an election has not been canceled pursuant to Section 10515, shall deliver to the county elections official of each affected county a list of voters qualified under the principal act of that district to vote in that county at the next landowner district election. For this purpose, the secretary of a landowner voting district shall be entitled to obtain from any office of an affected county all information necessary
 to prepare the list.

(b) The list delivered pursuant to subdivision (a) shall contain the name of each voter qualified under the principal act of the landowner voting district to vote at the next landowner district election, the residence of each voter, the division, if any, of the district in which each voter is entitled to vote, and the manner in which the votes are to be distributed.

(c) The secretary of the landowner district shall sign his or her name and affix the seal of the district at the bottom of the last page of the list. One copy of this list shall be conspicuously posted in the office of the district in a place to which the public generally has access. If the office is located in a private home, the list shall be posted in some public building.

(d) The governing board may, by resolution, determine that
 the duties of the secretary set forth in this section would best be performed by the county elections official, in which case the county elections official shall thereafter assume these duties.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

10526.

At least 30 days prior to the day fixed for the next general district election, the county elections official shall have prepared a sufficient number of ballots for the voters of each resident voter district participating in the election.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

10527.

At least 20 days prior to the date fixed for the next general district election, the county elections official shall have prepared a sufficient number of ballots for the voters of each landowner voting district participating in the election.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

10528.

Except as otherwise provided by this part, the form of the ballot to be used by the voters of a landowner voting district participating in the general district election shall be governed by the principal act of that district. The county elections official shall determine and specify the form of the ballot to be used by the voters of resident voting districts and may, if practicable, provide a consolidated ballot covering two or more district elections in the same precinct.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

10529.

Whenever a candidate has filed a declaration of candidacy, and the candidate’s declaration of candidacy has been certified as sufficient pursuant to Section 10513, the name of the candidate shall be printed upon the ballot unless the candidate has died and that fact has been ascertained by the officer charged with the duty of printing the ballots, at least 68 days before the day of the election.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

10530.

Vote by mail voting shall be allowed and conducted as nearly as practicable in accordance with Division 3 (commencing with Section 3000) pertaining to general elections, except in those districts in which voting by proxy is allowed unless a particular district shall, by resolution pursuant to Section 4108, provide for an all-mail ballot election.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2007, Ch. 508, Sec. 68.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

10531.

Notwithstanding any law, vote by mail voting shall be allowed in lieu of voting by proxy in an landowner district election in which voting by proxy is allowed if, at least 110 days before the election, the governing board of the district adopts this section. If a district adopts this section, the voting shall be conducted as follows:

(a) The vote by mail ballot shall be available to any eligible voter of the district.

(b) The form of application for the ballot shall be distributed to each voter with the voter information guide and shall contain spaces for each of the following:

(1) The printed name and address of the voter.

(2) The address to which the ballot is to be mailed.

(3) The voter’s signature.

(4) The authorization of a legal representative, as defined in Section 34030 of the Water Code, to receive the vote by mail voter’s ballot if the voter so chooses.

(5) The name and date of the election for which the request is made.

(6) The date the application shall be received by the county elections official, which date shall be at least seven days before the election.

(7) The insertion of the voter information guide name and address label on the application.

(c) Upon receipt of vote by mail ballot application and verification that it has been properly completed, the county elections official shall mail vote by mail voter’s ballot to the voter or legal representative with an identification envelope, which shall contain each of the following:

(1) A declaration under penalty of perjury stating that the voter is entitled to vote in the election.

(2) Space for the signature of the voter or legal representative and the date of signing.

(3) A notice that the envelope contains an official ballot and is to be opened
 only by the appropriate elections officials.

(d) The voting shall be pursuant to those additional procedures, if any, that the county elections official shall deem necessary to the proper conduct of the election, provided that the overall additional procedures shall substantially comply with Division 3 (commencing with Section 3000) and Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 15000) of Division 15, and shall be consistent with landowner voting requirements.

(e) Notwithstanding Section 10525, the list of voters for landowner voting district elections in which vote by mail voting is allowed shall be delivered to the county elections official at least 40 days before the election.

(f) The voter information guide for landowner voting
 district elections in which vote by mail voting is allowed shall be mailed at least 20 days before the election.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 422, Sec. 56.   (AB 2911)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

10532.

Nothing in this part shall prohibit a voter of a district, or his legal representative, from voting by proxy if this right is provided for by the principal act of that district, and the requirements and qualifications necessary for voting by proxy shall be governed, as nearly as practicable, by the principal act of that district.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

10533.

(a) The county elections official shall prepare for each precinct one voter list and one roster for each ballot form to be used at the polling place of the precinct at the general district election. Where, as provided by Section 10528, the county elections official provides for a consolidated ballot covering two or more district elections in the same precinct, the county elections official may also provide a consolidated voter list and consolidated roster for the voters receiving the consolidated ballot. The county elections official shall
 furnish each precinct board with its respective lists and rosters prior to the opening of the polls.

(b) For a landowner voting district election, the voter list shall specify the number of votes each voter is entitled to cast.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

10534.

If the county elections official fails to appoint a precinct board or the members appointed are not present when the polls open on the day of the general district election, a majority of the voters of the precinct present at that hour, including members of the precinct board, may appoint the precinct board or appoint a person in place of an absent member.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

10535.

The inspector is chairman of the precinct board.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

10536.

If during the election any judge or elections official ceases to act, the inspector may appoint a substitute.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

10537.

If the inspector ceases to act, a majority of the remaining members of the precinct board may appoint a substitute.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

10538.

Any member of a precinct board may administer and certify oaths required to be administered during an election.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

10539.

Before opening the polls, each member of the precinct board shall sign a declaration to perform faithfully his or her duties, before the inspector or before any other member of the board.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

10540.

Candidates’ statements of their qualifications submitted in accordance with Section 13307 shall be filed with the county elections official, who shall cause the voters’ pamphlet, if any is required, to be mailed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 221, Sec. 20.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

10541.

The polls shall open at 7 a.m. and remain open until 8 p.m. In any precinct in which all of the eligible voters have voted prior to the time for closing the polls, the precinct board may thereupon close the polls, canvass the votes and make the returns as required by law. However, regardless of the time of closing the polls, no totals of votes cast or other returns shall be announced or disclosed prior to 8 p.m.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

10542.

The principal act of each landowner voting district participating in the general district election shall govern the manner in which the ballot is delivered by the clerk or judge to a voter of that district, the method by which the voter casts his vote or votes, and the manner in which the ballot is returned by the voter to the clerk or judge and placed in the ballot box.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

10543.

Voting shall be conducted, the canvass at the polls made, and the returns delivered to the county elections official, except as otherwise provided by this part, as nearly as practicable in accordance with the provisions of this code pertaining to general elections.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

10544.

A governing body of a district may, by resolution, limit campaign contributions in elections to district offices.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

10545.

The envelope, certificate with the roster, tally lists, and voter list, shall be all of the following:

(a) Sealed in an envelope by the inspector in the presence of the judge and clerk.

(b) Endorsed “Election returns of (naming the precinct) precinct.”

(c) Directed to the county elections official.

(d) Immediately delivered by the inspector or by a responsible person designated by him, to the county elections official.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 806, Sec. 27.   (SB 286)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

10546.

Recount of votes in any general district election shall be governed by the provisions of Chapter 12 (commencing with Section 15600) of Division 15.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

10547.

The county elections official shall commence the canvass of the returns not later than the first Thursday after each general district election.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

10548.

The canvass shall be made in public and by opening the returns and determining the vote for each person voted for and declaring the results thereof.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

10549.

No roster, tally list, or certificate returned from any general district election shall be set aside or rejected for want of form if it can be satisfactorily understood.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

10550.

As soon as the result of the canvass by the county elections official is declared, the county elections official shall prepare and mail a statement of the result to the secretary of each district participating in the general district election. The statement shall be signed by the county elections official, authenticated by the seal of the county and shall show:

(a) The number of ballots cast for elective offices of that district and, when directors of that district are elected by divisions, the number
 of ballots cast in each division.

(b) The name of each candidate for an elective office of that district voted for and the office.

(c) The number of votes cast in each precinct for each candidate.

(d) When directors are elected by divisions, the number of votes cast in each division for each candidate for the office of director from that division.

(e) The number of votes cast in the district for all other elective offices of that district.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

10551.

(a) No later than the Monday before the first Friday in December the county elections official shall declare the elected candidate or candidates. If there is but one person to be elected to an elective office, the candidate receiving the highest number of votes cast for the candidates for that office shall be declared elected. If there are two or more persons to be elected to an elective office, those candidates equal in number to the number to be elected who receive the highest number of votes for the office shall be declared elected.
